Rhode Island statutes. Title 31 Motor and Other Vehicles
Chapter 44 Mobile and Manufactured Homes
31-44-17.
Filing of complaint with department — Notice — Rules of evidence not binding.

Any resident of a mobile and manufactured housing park or any owner of a mobile and manufactured housing park may petition the director by filing a complaint with the department of business regulation. After review of the claim and a decision by the director that the matter has merit and is not frivolous, the director shall schedule a hearing within sixty (60) days from receipt of the claim. If the director finds the claim to be without merit or to be frivolous, the director shall dismiss the complaint and explain in writing to the complainant his or her reasons for dismissing the complaint.

The director, or his or her agent, shall serve notice, in writing, of the time and place of the hearing upon all appropriate parties at least twenty (20) days prior to the date of the hearing. Both parties to the complaint may be represented by counsel.

The director, or his or her agent, shall not be bound by common law or statutory rules of evidence but may admit all testimony having a reasonable probative value. Complaints filed shall be handled in accordance with the departments’ rules of practice and the administrative procedures act, chapter 35 of title 42. It may exclude evidence which, in the opinion of the director or his or her agent, is immaterial, irrelevant, or unduly repetitious.

History of Section.

P.L. 1996, ch. 94, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 248, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 176, § 17; P.L. 2018, ch. 289, § 17.

31-44-18.
Decisions, judicial review and enforcement.

When the director makes a decision, an order shall be made in writing and shall include finding of facts. The findings of fact shall be accompanied by a concise and explicit statement of the underlying facts supporting the findings. The parties shall be notified by mail of any decision or order.

A decision of the director may be appealed, by either party, by applying for a rehearing or appealing to the superior court for the county in which either party resides, within thirty (30) days of the date of the decision pursuant to the provisions of the Administrative Procedures Act, chapter 35 of title 42.

If no timely appeal is taken pursuant to subsection (b) of this section, the decision of the director shall become final. The director shall file a certified abstract of any final decision with the clerk of the superior court in the county of residence of the complainant. The clerk of the court shall enter judgment on it, and this judgment may be enforced as with any final judgment of the superior court.

History of Section.

P.L. 1996, ch. 94, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 248, § 1.

31-44-19.
Notification and cooperation required.

The director shall notify the attorney general’s consumer protection division and antitrust bureau, department of justice, that the attorney general may accept and act on written complaints properly forwarded to it by the director relative to mobile/manufactured housing.

History of Section.

P.L. 1996, ch. 94, § 1.

31-44-20.
Mobile home conveyance tax.

There is imposed, on every deed, instrument, or writing by which any mobile or manufactured home shall be granted, assigned, transferred, or otherwise conveyed to, or vested in, the purchaser or purchasers, or any other person or persons, by his or her or their direction, when the consideration paid exceeds one hundred dollars ($100), a tax at the rate of one dollar and forty cents ($1.40) for each five hundred dollars ($500) or fractional part thereof which is paid for the purchase of the home (inclusive of the value of any lien or encumbrance remaining on it at the time of sale), and exclusive of any personal property that may be included in the sale which tax shall be payable at the time of making, execution, delivery, acceptance or presenting for recording of the instrument. In the absence of an agreement to the contrary, the tax shall be paid by the grantor.

In the event no consideration is actually paid for the mobile or manufactured home, the instrument of conveyance shall contain a statement to the effect that the consideration is such that no documentary stamps are required.

The tax administrator shall enforce the provisions of this section and may adopt and enforce rules and regulations relating to the enforcement of this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1996, ch. 319, § 1.

31-44-21.
Documentary stamps.

The payment of the tax imposed by this chapter shall be evidenced by the affixing of a documentary stamp or stamps to instrument by the person making, executing, delivering, or presenting for recording the instrument and only the original instrument shall be accepted for recording. The stamps shall be affixed in the manner that is consistent with §

44-25-4.1

authorizing the use of hand stamps. The recorder of deeds or clerks shall affix upon the face of each original instrument, by hand stamp issued by the tax administrator, a receipt clearly showing the amount of tax paid by the person making, executing, delivering, or presenting for recording the original instrument.

Whenever a hand stamp is authorized and used, the provisions of § 44-25-4(b) and (c) shall apply to the hand stamp.

History of Section.

P.L. 1996, ch. 319, § 1.

31-44-22.
Sale price recording.

Every deed presented for recording due to the sale of property, which results in the transfer in ownership of the property, shall contain or have endorsed upon it the total dollar amount of the actual sale, which shall be recorded as part of the deed. A city or town clerk may decline to accept a deed for recording if the deed is not in compliance with this section. Failure to comply with this section shall not affect the validity of any deed.

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 309, § 2; P.L. 2007, ch. 340, § 5.